Alabama, session 2026rs, HB177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 13A-11-240 and 13A-11-243, Code of
Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
"§13A-11-240
(a) The word "torture" as used in this article shall
mean theact of doing physical injury to a dog or cat by the
infliction of inhumane treatment or gross physical abuse meant
to cause said animal intensive or prolonged pain or serious
physical injury, or thereby causing death due to said act.
(b) The word "cruel" as used in this article shall
mean:
For purposes of this article, the following terms have
the following meanings:
(1) ABANDON. To forsake entirely or leave a dog or cat
at a location without providing minimum reasonable care.
(2) CRUEL. Every act, omission, or neglect, including
abandonment, where unnecessary or unjustifiable pain or
suffering, including abandonment, is caused or where
unnecessary pain or suffering is allowed to continue.
(c) The words "dog or cat" as used in this article
shall mean any(3) DOG or CAT. Any domesticated member of the
dog or cat family.
(4) TORTURE. The act of doing physical injury to a dog
or cat by the infliction of inhumane treatment or gross
physical abuse that causes the dog or cat intensive or
prolonged pain or serious physical injury, or thereby causing
death."
Page 2

death."
HB177 INTRODUCED
"§13A-11-243
(a) Any law enforcement officer and any or agent of the
a county or the municipality appointed pursuant to Section
13A-11-242, having reasonable belief, evidence of, or having
found a dog or cat to be neglected or cruelly treated that has
a reasonable belief of, has evidence of, or observes a
violation of this article may perform do either of the
following:
(1) Remove the dog or cat from its present location.
(2) Order the owner of the dog or cat to provide
certain care to the dog or cat at the owner's expense without
the removal of the dog or cat from its present location.
(b) Neither the county or municipality, nor any
employee or agent of the county or municipality, acting in
good faith, shall be liable for any actions taken under this
section, regardless of whether or not the dog or cat is
returned to its owner after impoundment."
Section 2. Section 13A-11-241.1 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§13A-11-241.1
(a) A person commits the crime of abandonment of a dog
or cat if he or she, with criminal negligence, abandons a dog
or cat.
(b) Abandonment of a dog or cat is a Class C
misdemeanor.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3